src/morphology/affixes/numbers.lexc
!! Quantifier inflection

!! Numerals in the MOKSHA language inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns.

!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! NUMERALS
!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NUMERAL-TYPES
фкя+Num+Card:фкя NMN_VAL1MIA ;
фкя+Num:васен NUMERALS-TO-ORD ;
фкя+Num+Der+Der/Iter+Adv+Iter:весть # ;
фкя+Num:фи NUMERALS-FOR-COLL ;

кафта+Num+Card:кафт%{АОØ%} N_OFTA ;
кафта+Num:омбо NUMERALS-TO-ORD ;
кафта+Num:каф NUMERALS-TO-ITER ;
кафта+Num:кафо NUMERALS-FOR-ASSOCCOLL ;
кафта+Num:кафо NUMERALS-FOR-COLL ;
кафта+Num+Der+Der/Ord+A+Ord:омбо NUMERALS-FOR-COLL ;

колма+Num:колм%{АО%} NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-PULA ;

ниле+Num:ниле NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-PINE ;
вете+Num:вете NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-PINE ;
кота+Num:кот%{АО%} NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-PULA ;
сисем+Num:сисем NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1 ;
кафкса+Num:кафкс%{АО%} NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-PULA ;
вейхкса+Num:вейхкс%{АО%} NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-PULA ;
кемонь+Num:кемонь NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1 ;

колмогемонь+Num:колмогемонь NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1 ;
ниленьгемонь+Num:ниленьгемонь NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1 ;
ведьгемонь+Num:ведьгемонь NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1 ;
кодгемонь+Num:кодгемонь NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1 ;
сизьгемонь+Num:сизьгемонь NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1 ;
кафксоньгемонь+Num:кафксоньгемонь NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1 ;
вейхксоньгемонь+Num:вейхксоньгемонь NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1 ;
сяда+Num:сяд%{АОØ%} NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-OFTA ;

LEXICON NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-PINE
+Card: N_PINE ;
NUMERALS-ASSOCCOLL/COLL/ITER/ORD ;
LEXICON NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-PULA
+Card: NMN_PULA ;
NUMERALS-ASSOCCOLL/COLL/ITER/ORD ;
LEXICON NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-KIAL1
+Card: N_KIAL1 ;
NUMERALS-ASSOCCOLL/COLL/ITER/ORD ;
LEXICON NUMERALS-3-AND-UP-OFTA
+Card: N_OFTA ;
NUMERALS-ASSOCCOLL/COLL/ITER/ORD ;

LEXICON NUMERALS-ASSOCCOLL/COLL/ITER/ORD
 NUMERALS-FOR-ASSOCCOLL ;
 NUMERALS-FOR-COLL ;
 NUMERALS-TO-ITER ;
 NUMERALS-TO-ORD ;

LEXICON NUMERALS-FOR-ASSOCCOLL
+AssocColl+PxSg1:%>нен # ;
+AssocColl+PxSg2:%>нет # ;
+AssocColl+PxSg3:%>ненза # ;

+AssocColl+PxPl1:%>нек # ;
+AssocColl+PxPl1:%>ненк # ;
+AssocColl+PxPl2:%>нент # ;
+AssocColl+PxPl3:%>нест # ;

LEXICON NUMERALS-FOR-COLL
+Coll+Sg+Nom:%>%{ЕОØ%}нст # ;
+Coll+Sg+Nom:%>%{ЕОØ%}цьке # ;

LEXICON NUMERALS-TO-ITER
+Der+Der/Iter+Adv+Iter:%>ксть # ;
LEXICON NUMERALS-TO-ORD
+Der+Der/Ord+A+Ord:%>це NMN_AVA ;


!!!!!!!!!!!
!! NUMBERS 
!!!!!!!!!!!

!LEXICON QNT_
!: K ;

LEXICON NUM_
: K ;

LEXICON NUM-CARD_
+Card: K ;

LEXICON NUM-CARD_AVA
+Card: NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON NUM-CARD_PULA
+Card: NMN_PULA ;

LEXICON NUM-CARD_KAL
+Card: NMN_KAL ;


LEXICON NUM-COLL_
+Card+Coll:	K ;

!LEXICON NUM-ITER_
!+Mult: K ;

LEXICON NUM-ORD_
+Ord: K ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
